District of Columbia statutes.
26-1154.01

Rulemaking authority.

The Mayor shall promulgate rules in accordance with Chapter 5 of Title 2, to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The rules shall be promulgated within 90 days of May 7, 2002.

May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, § 401, 49 DCR 2551
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 401 of Home Loan Protection Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-295, March 1, 2002, 49 DCR 2534).